test/src/morphology/verbit_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# Contracted -it verbs. TSIEGGIT_TV, VALLIT_TV, SJIERRIT_IV

Tests:
  Verb - lievddit: # TSIEGGIT_TV
    lievddit+V+TV+Inf: lievddit 
    lievddit+V+TV+Sup: lievdditjit
    lievddit+V+TV+Ger: lievddidijn
    lievddit+V+TV+PrfPrc: lievddim
    lievddit+V+TV+Actio+Ess: lievddimin
    lievddit+V+TV+Actio+Ela: lievddimis
    lievddit+V+TV+VAbess: lievddik
    lievddit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lievddiv
    lievddit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: lievddi
    lievddit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lievddi
    lievddit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: lievddijin 
    lievddit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du2: lievddibihtte
    lievddit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du3: lievddiba
    lievddit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: lievddiji
    lievddit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: lievddijiv
    lievddit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: lievddiji
    lievddit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lievddij
    lievddit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: lievddijma 
    lievddit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: lievddijda
    lievddit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: lievddijin
    lievddit+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: lievddi
    lievddit+V+TV+Imprt+Pl1: lievddijip
    lievddit+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: [lievddijit,ievddijihtit]
    lievddit+V+TV+Imprt+Pl3: lievddijisá
    lievddit+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: lievddijuhtut
    lievddit+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: lievddijusá
    lievddit+V+TV+Pot+Pl1: lievdditjip
    lievddit+V+TV+Pot+Pl2: lievdditjihpit
    lievddit+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: lievdditji

  Verb - alvvit: # VALLIT_TV
    alvvit+V+TV+Inf: alvvit 
    alvvit+V+TV+Sup: alvvitjit
    alvvit+V+TV+Ger: alvvidijn
    alvvit+V+TV+PrfPrc: alvvim
    alvvit+V+TV+Actio+Ess: alvvimin
    alvvit+V+TV+Actio+Ela: alvvimis
    alvvit+V+TV+VAbess: alvvik
    alvvit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: alvviv
    alvvit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: alvvi
    alvvit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: alvvibihtit
    alvvit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: alvviji
    alvvit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: alvvijiv
    alvvit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: alvviji
    alvvit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: alvvij
    alvvit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: alvvijma 
    alvvit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: alvvijda
    alvvit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: alvvijga
    alvvit+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: alvvi
    alvvit+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: alvvijis
    alvvit+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: alvvijinno 
    alvvit+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: alvvijihtte
    alvvit+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: alvvijiska
    alvvit+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: [alvvijit,alvvijihtit]
    alvvit+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: alvvijup
    alvvit+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: alvvijuhtut
    alvvit+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: alvvijusá
    alvvit+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: alvvitjav
    alvvit+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: alvvitja
    alvvit+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: alvvisj
    alvvit+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: alvvitji

  Verb - slabttsit: # SJIERRIT_IV
    slabttsit+V+IV+Inf: slabttsit 
    slabttsit+V+IV+Sup: slabttsitjit
    slabttsit+V+IV+Ger: slabttsidijn
    slabttsit+V+IV+PrfPrc: slabttsim
    slabttsit+V+IV+Actio+Ess: slabttsimin
    slabttsit+V+IV+Actio+Ela: slabttsimis
    slabttsit+V+IV+VAbess: slabttsik
    slabttsit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: slabttsiv
    slabttsit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: slabttsi
    slabttsit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: slabttsi
    slabttsit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: slabttsijin 
    slabttsit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: slabttsibihtte
    slabttsit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: slabttsiba
    slabttsit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: slabttsiji
    slabttsit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: slabttsijiv
    slabttsit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: slabttsiji
    slabttsit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: slabttsij
    slabttsit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: slabttsijma 
    slabttsit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: slabttsijda
    slabttsit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: slabttsijin
    slabttsit+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: slabttsi
    slabttsit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl1: slabttsijip
    slabttsit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: [slabttsijit,slabttsijihtit]
    slabttsit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: slabttsijisá
    slabttsit+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: slabttsijuhtut
    slabttsit+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: slabttsijusá
    slabttsit+V+IV+Pot+Pl1: slabttsitjip
    slabttsit+V+IV+Pot+Pl2: slabttsitjihpit
    slabttsit+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: slabttsitji
